Utah statutes.
78B-1-121.   Jurors and witnesses -- Statement of service -- Certificate.
Whenever a grand juror, or a witness for the state before the grand jury, is
finally discharged, the foreman of the grand jury shall furnish to the clerk
of the district court a statement containing information necessary for the
clerk to make the juror's or witness's certificate.
